Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1614.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2102(b)(2) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2102. Regulations.* * *(b) Seasons, possession, bag limits and devices.--* * *(2) If in any year the commission fails to establish seasons or bag limits or fails to establish other hunting or furtaking regulations under authority of this title, the open seasons and bag limits for game or furbearers, [Sundays excepted,] unless otherwise provided by this title, and all other hunting or furtaking regulations adopted under 12345678910111213141516171819 authority of this title, shall be the same as set by regulation of the commission for the previous license year, and all seasons shall open and close one calendar day earlier than the previous license year. In the event the commission fails to establish seasons and bag limits for a license year beginning in a leap year, the seasons shall open and close two calendar days earlier than the previous license year.* * *Section 2. Sections 2303 and 2315 of Title 34 are repealed:[§ 2303. Hunting on Sunday prohibited.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in this title, it is unlawful for any person to hunt for any furbearer or game on Sunday.(b) Construction of section.--This section shall not be construed to prohibit:(1) The training of dogs.(2) The participation in dog trials as provided for in this title.(3) The removal of lawfully taken game or wildlife from traps or the resetting of the traps on Sunday.(b.1) Exceptions.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to:(1) The hunting of foxes.(2) The hunting of coyotes.(3) Any hunting which occurs on noncommercial regulated hunting grounds holding a valid permit under section 2928(b)(2) (relating to regulated hunting grounds permits).(4) Hunting on three Sundays each calendar year, as follows:(i) One day of Sunday hunting shall be instituted by the commission during the deer rifle season.20250HB1614PN1931 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) One day of Sunday hunting shall be instituted by the commission during the Statewide deer archery season.(iii) One day of Sunday hunting as determined by the commission shall be instituted by the commission.Authority to hunt on any Sunday instituted by the commission under this paragraph shall not apply to any person required to secure a hunting license who attempts to hunt on private land without obtaining written permission of the landowner, an agent of the landowner or lessee.(c) Penalty.--A violation of this section is a summary offense of the fifth degree.§ 2315. Hunting on Sunday without written permission.(a) General rule.--A person required to secure a hunting license to hunt commits an offense if, while engaged in hunting on Sunday under section 2303(b.1)(4) (relating to hunting on Sunday prohibited), the person enters private land without obtaining written permission of the landowner, an agent of the landowner or lessee.(b) Penalty.--A person who violates subsection (a) commits a summary offense of the third degree.]Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1614PN1931 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122